Maryland, session 2025, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1090*

HOUSE BILL 1090
Article – Human Services
5–502.
Except as provided in [§ 5–503] §§ 5–503 AND 5–503.1 of this subtitle, if any
provision of this subtitle conflicts with any federal law, the federal law shall prevail.
5–503.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE FOOD SUPPLEMENT BENEFITS TO A
STUDENT WHO:
(1) IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE;
(2) IS ENROLLED IN AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE
STATE;
(3) IS ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN A STATE– OR FEDERALLY
FINANCED WORK STUDY PROGRAM FOR AT LEAST ONE SEMESTER DURING AN
ACADEMIC YEAR; AND
(4) PARTICIPATES IN A WORK STUDY PROGRAM FOR AN AVERAGE OF
20 HOURS PER WEEK THROUGHOUT A SEMESTER.
(B) A STUDENT ELIGIBLE FOR FOOD SUPPLEMENT BENEFITS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL REMAIN ELIGIBLE FOR BENEFITS FOR AN
ENTIRE ACADEMIC YEAR REGARDLESS OF THE LENGTH OF ANY BREAK DURING THE
ACADEMIC YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before August 1, 2025, the Maryland Higher Education Commission
shall add to the Maryland College Aid Processing System application a question regarding
whether, in the previous 6 months, the applicant has missed a meal because of an inability
to afford the meal.
(b) The Maryland Higher Education Commission may not require a student to
answer the question required under subsection (a) of this section in the affirmative in order
for the student to be eligible for financial aid.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.